District of Columbia statutes.
22-2701.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this section, §§ 22-2701, 22-2703, and 22-2723, § 22-2704, §§ 22-2705 to 22-2712, §§ 22-2713 to 22-2720, and § 22-2722:

(1)

“Arranging for prostitution” means any act to procure or attempt to procure or otherwise arrange for the purpose of prostitution, regardless of whether such procurement or arrangement occurred or anything of value was given or received.

(2)

“Domestic partner” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(3).

(3)

“Prostitution” means a sexual act or contact with another person in return for giving or receiving anything of value.

(4)

“Prostitution-related offenses” means those crimes and offenses defined in this act and in the acts cited in the lead-in language of this section.

(5)

“Sexual act” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-3001(8).

(6)

“Sexual contact” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-3001(9).

(7)

“Solicit for prostitution” means to invite, entice, offer, persuade, or agree to engage in prostitution or address for the purpose of inviting, enticing, offering, persuading, or agreeing to engage in prostitution.

Dec. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 4-57, § 2, 28 DCR 4652
May 7, 1993, D.C. Law 9-267, § 3, 39 DCR 5684
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 212, 53 DCR 8610
May 7, 2015, D.C. Law 20-276, § 8, 62 DCR 479
This section is referenced in § 4-1321.02, § 16-2301, § 22-2731, § 22-4001, § 25-823, § 42-3101, and § 47-2844.
1981 Ed., § 22-2701.1.
D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote the section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-276 added substituted “anything of value was given or received” for “a fee was paid” in (1); and substituted “anything of value” for “a fee” in (3).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 212 of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 212 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 212 of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 212 of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
“This act”, referred to in the introductory language, is D.C. Law 4-57.